Delaware, session 153, HB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter IV, Chapter 34, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3438A. Teacher Academy scholarship. (a) For purposes of this section: (1) âCareer and Technical Education programsâ mean programs established by the Department of Education that provide students with rigorous academic content, relevant technical knowledge and skills, and leadership development in a particular field or provide students with the opportunity to participate in work-based learning and to earn a recognized postsecondary credential as well as advanced postsecondary credit or standing in a particular field. (2) âEducator preparation programâ means a program for educator training approved by the Department of Education in accordance with Â§ 1280 of this title. (3) âTeacher Academyâ means a Career and Technical Education program offered in Delaware public schools, including charter and vocational-technical schools, that prepares students for careers in elementary and secondary education. (b) There is established a Teacher Academy scholarship for individuals who have successfully completed a Teacher Academy and are enrolled in a Delaware college or university. (c) The scholarship award shall be $2,500 for 1 year only. The money may be paid in 2 equal parts, 1 part to be paid each semester. If there are more applicants than funding available, the Department of Education will develop criteria for a competitive awards process. (d) To be eligible for a Teacher Academy scholarship, an applicant must have completed a Teacher Academy and be enrolled in an educator preparation program in Delaware as a full-time student with the intent to earn a bachelorâs degree. The applicant must attend the educator preparation program beginning the fall semester directly after high school graduation. (e) Applicants applying for an educator support scholarship, under Â§ 3438 of this title, shall also be considered for the Teacher Academy scholarship. A separate application for a Teacher Academy scholarship may not be required. (f) Applicants must apply for all appropriate forms of financial aid for which the student is eligible including the Federal Pell Grant, financial aid programs administered by the Delaware Higher Education Office, and financial aid programs administered by the institution of higher education. Applicants must accept all financial assistance offered or awarded to the applicant, except for loans. Section 2. The scholarship created by Section 1 of this Act will be available to students entering or enrolled in an educator preparation program beginning in the 2025-2026 school year. No more than 35 Teacher Academy scholarships may be awarded per year. The scholarship shall be expanded based on interest and funding in subsequent school years and will continue as funding is available.